District of Columbia statutes.
29-414.03

Entitlement to cumulate votes.

Members of a nonprofit corporation that were entitled to cumulate their votes for the election of directors on the effective date of this chapter shall continue to be entitled to cumulate their votes for the election of directors until otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720